District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.84

Management of the Agency.

(a)

The Agency shall be administered by the Risk Officer.

(b)

The Risk Officer shall employ a captive manager who shall run the day-to-day affairs of the Agency and shall report to the Risk Officer. The Risk Officer shall employ such other professionals as are necessary or appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this part.

(c)

The Risk Officer may delegate the authority to perform any function authorized to be performed by the Risk Officer under this part.

(d)

The Risk Officer may hire Agency staff.

History

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-196, § 5, 55 DCR 6261

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-307.81.